Ohio, session 136, SB105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3314.03, 3326.11, and 3328.24 be 7
amended and section 3313.88 of the Revised Code be enacted to 8
read as follows: 9
Sec. 3313.88. (A) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school 10
year, the board of education of each school district and the 11
governing authority of each chartered nonpublic school shall 12
implement a wearable panic alert system at each school facility. 13
Each wearable panic alert system shall be capable of integrating 14
with local public safety answering point infrastructure to 15
transmit 9-1-1 calls and mobile activations and initiating a 16
campus-wide lockdown notification. 17
(B) Each district board and governing authority shall 18
provide each staff person in a school facility with a wearable 19

S. B. No. 105 Page 2
As Introduced
panic alert device that allows for immediate contact with local 20
emergency response agencies. 21
(C) Prior to the first day of school each year, each 22
district board and governing authority shall ensure that all 23
school facility personnel receive training on the protocol for 24
and appropriate use of the panic alert device. 25
(D) Each district board and governing authority shall 26
ensure that all security data within a school facility is 27
accessible by a local law enforcement agency and coordinate with 28
the local law enforcement agency to establish appropriate access 29
protocols. Accessible security data includes cameras, maps, and 30
access control. 31
(E)(1) Any records, information, photographs, audio and 32
visual presentations, schematic diagrams, surveys, 33
recommendations, or consultations or portions thereof relating 34
directly to the physical security or fire safety of a school 35
facility or revealing security or fire safety systems, that are 36
accessed or held by an agency under this section are 37
confidential and are not public records within the meaning of 38
section 149.43 of the Revised Code. 39
(2) Information made confidential under this division may 40
be disclosed: 41
(a) To the property owner or leaseholder of the school 42
facility; 43
(b) In furtherance of the official duties and 44
responsibilities of the agency holding the information; 45
(c) To another local, state, or federal agency in 46
furtherance of that agency's official duties and 47
responsibilities; 48

S. B. No. 105 Page 3
As Introduced
(d) Upon a showing of good cause before a court of 49
competent jurisdiction. 50
(F) The department of education and workforce may adopt 51
rules to implement this section as are necessary to protect the 52
health and safety of students and educators. 53
Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under 54
this section shall be filed with the director of education and 55
workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make 56
available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed 57
contract filed with the director under this section. 58
(A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the 59
governing authority of a community school shall specify the 60
following: 61
(1) That the school shall be established as either of the 62
following: 63
(a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 64
1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 65
2003; 66
(b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 67
1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. 68
(2) The education program of the school, including the 69
school's mission, the characteristics of the students the school 70
is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the 71
focus of the curriculum; 72
(3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of 73
measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those 74
goals, which shall include the statewide achievement 75
assessments; 76

S. B. No. 105 Page 4
As Introduced
(4) Performance standards, including but not limited to 77
all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 78
or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the 79
school will be evaluated by the sponsor; 80
(5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the 81
Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised 82
Code; 83
(6)(a) Dismissal procedures; 84
(b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an 85
attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically 86
withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a 87
legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two 88
consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the 89
student. 90
(7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and 91
ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; 92
(8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of 93
state. The contract shall require financial records of the 94
school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial 95
records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of 96
state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 97
117.10 of the Revised Code. 98
(9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities 99
to be used that contains at least the following information: 100
(a) A detailed description of each facility used for 101
instructional purposes; 102
(b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility 103
that are paid by or on behalf of the school; 104

S. B. No. 105 Page 5
As Introduced
(c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments 105
that are paid by the school; 106
(d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as 107
such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the 108
operator, if any. 109
(10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the 110
following: 111
(a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be 112
licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the 113
Revised Code, except that a community school may engage 114
noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty 115
hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; 116
(b) A prohibition against the school employing an 117
individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in 118
any position. 119
(11) That the school will comply with the following 120
requirements: 121
(a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a 122
minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred 123
twenty hours per school year. 124
(b) The governing authority will purchase liability 125
insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of 126
the school. 127
(c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, 128
admission policies, employment practices, and all other 129
operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or 130
religious institution. 131
(d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 132

S. B. No. 105 Page 6
As Introduced
109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 133
3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 134
3313.472, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 135
3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 136
3313.6024, 3313.6025, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.643, 137
3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 138
3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 139
3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 140
3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 141
3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 142
3313.86, 3313.88, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 143
3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 3319.324, 144
3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 3319.614, 145
3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 146
3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 147
3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 148
5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 149
4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a 150
school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 of the 151
Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 of the 152
Revised Code. 153
(e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 154
2921.42 of the Revised Code. 155
(f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 156
3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the 157
Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for 158
the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 159
3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must 160
successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to 161
receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the 162
curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community 163

S. B. No. 105 Page 7
As Introduced
school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of 164
the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with 165
students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after 166
July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 167
of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the 168
curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school 169
diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed 170
in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the 171
Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or 172
(F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for 173
awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject 174
area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, 175
with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh 176
and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on 177
subject area competency adopted by the department under 178
divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised 179
Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall 180
comply with the framework for granting units of high school 181
credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency 182
through work-based learning experiences, internships, or 183
cooperative education developed by the department under division 184
(J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. 185
(g) The school governing authority will submit within four 186
months after the end of each school year a report of its 187
activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of 188
divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial 189
status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled 190
in the school. 191
(h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer- 192
based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the 193
Revised Code as if it were a school district. 194

S. B. No. 105 Page 8
As Introduced
(i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant 195
awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), 196
Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery 197
and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, 198
the school will pay teachers based upon performance in 199
accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 200
3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. 201
(j) If the school operates a preschool program that is 202
licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of 203
the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 204
to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for 205
preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department 206
of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. 207
(k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 208
3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district 209
unless it is either of the following: 210
(i) An internet- or computer-based community school; 211
(ii) A community school in which a majority of the 212
enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in 213
division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. 214
(l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the 215
Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based 216
community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the 217
Revised Code. 218
(12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits 219
to employees; 220
(13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the 221
beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five 222
years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division 223

S. B. No. 105 Page 9
As Introduced
(E) of this section. 224
(14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be 225
responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; 226
(15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget 227
for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the 228
total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. 229
(16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition 230
of employees of the school in the event the contract is 231
terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the 232
Revised Code; 233
(17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all 234
or part of an existing public school or educational service 235
center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is 236
a converted public school or service center building, 237
specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer 238
that the board of education or service center governing board 239
that operated the school or building before conversion is 240
delegating to the governing authority of the community school 241
with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided 242
the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining 243
agreement applicable to such employees; 244
(18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving 245
disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the 246
governing authority of the community school; 247
(19) A provision requiring the governing authority to 248
adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside 249
outside the district in which the school is located. That policy 250
shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in 251
sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the 252

S. B. No. 105 Page 10
As Introduced
sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: 253
(a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside 254
the district in which the school is located; 255
(b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in 256
districts adjacent to the district in which the school is 257
located; 258
(c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any 259
other district in the state. 260
(20) A provision recognizing the authority of the 261
department to take over the sponsorship of the school in 262
accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 263
3314.015 of the Revised Code; 264
(21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to 265
assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified 266
in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; 267
(22) A provision recognizing both of the following: 268
(a) The authority of public health and safety officials to 269
inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities 270
closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in 271
compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; 272
(b) The authority of the department as the community 273
school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school 274
under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has 275
evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that 276
pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's 277
students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such 278
action. 279
(23) A description of the learning opportunities that will 280

S. B. No. 105 Page 11
As Introduced
be offered to students including both classroom-based and non- 281
classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance 282
with criteria for student participation established by the 283
department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the 284
Revised Code; 285
(24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 286
3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to 287
be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall 288
be taken by the sponsor of the school. 289
(25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school 290
will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of 291
September each school year, unless the mission of the school as 292
specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to 293
serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school 294
fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one 295
year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) 296
of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the 297
school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. 298
(26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning 299
to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent 300
under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; 301
(27) That the school's attendance and participation 302
policies will be available for public inspection; 303
(28) That the school's attendance and participation 304
records shall be made available to the department, auditor of 305
state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in 306
accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act 307
of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any 308
regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of 309

S. B. No. 105 Page 12
As Introduced
the Revised Code; 310
(29) If a school operates using the blended learning 311
model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all 312
of the following information: 313
(a) An indication of what blended learning model or models 314
will be used; 315
(b) A description of how student instructional needs will 316
be determined and documented; 317
(c) The method to be used for determining competency, 318
granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; 319
(d) The school's attendance requirements, including how 320
the school will document participation in learning 321
opportunities; 322
(e) A statement describing how student progress will be 323
monitored; 324
(f) A statement describing how private student data will 325
be protected; 326
(g) A description of the professional development 327
activities that will be offered to teachers. 328
(30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's 329
operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash 330
flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear 331
interest at a fair market rate; 332
(31) A provision requiring that, if the governing 333
authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity 334
specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity 335
shall be independent from the operator with which the school has 336

S. B. No. 105 Page 13
As Introduced
contracted. 337
(32) A provision requiring the governing authority to 338
adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a 339
student's parent to notify the community school in which the 340
student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of 341
the parent's or student's primary residence. 342
(33) A provision requiring the governing authority to 343
adopt a student residence and address verification policy for 344
students enrolling in or attending the school. 345
(B) The community school shall also submit to the sponsor 346
a comprehensive plan for the school. The plan shall specify the 347
following: 348
(1) The process by which the governing authority of the 349
school will be selected in the future; 350
(2) The management and administration of the school; 351
(3) If the community school is a currently existing public 352
school or educational service center building, alternative 353
arrangements for current public school students who choose not 354
to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not 355
to teach in the school or building after conversion; 356
(4) The instructional program and educational philosophy 357
of the school; 358
(5) Internal financial controls. 359
When submitting the plan under this division, the school 360
shall also submit copies of all policies and procedures 361
regarding internal financial controls adopted by the governing 362
authority of the school. 363

S. B. No. 105 Page 14
As Introduced
(C) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the 364
Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a 365
community school may provide for the community school governing 366
authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby 367
authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract 368
between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total 369
amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical 370
assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the 371
total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school 372
receives from the state. 373
(D) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor 374
which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered 375
into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 376
of the Revised Code and shall include the following: 377
(1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all 378
laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the 379
contract; 380
(2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal 381
performance and the organization and operation of the community 382
school on at least an annual basis; 383
(3) Provide technical assistance to the community school 384
in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the 385
contract; 386
(4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to 387
correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare 388
the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 389
3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the 390
school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or 391
terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 392

S. B. No. 105 Page 15
As Introduced
of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; 393
(5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the 394
event the community school experiences financial difficulties or 395
closes prior to the end of a school year. 396
(E) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under 397
this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the 398
approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that 399
contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not 400
ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor 401
finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and 402
terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the 403
academic goals prescribed in the contract have been 404
satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division 405
remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, 406
and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. 407
(F) If a community school fails to open for operation 408
within one year after the contract entered into under this 409
section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 410
of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the 411
expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the 412
school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A 413
school shall not be considered permanently closed because the 414
operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 415
3314.072 of the Revised Code. 416
Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and 417
mathematics school established under this chapter and its 418
governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 419
121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 420
3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 421
3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 3313.48, 422

S. B. No. 105 Page 16
As Introduced
3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 423
3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 424
3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6025, 3313.6026, 425
3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 426
3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 427
3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 428
3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 429
3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 430
3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 431
3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 432
3313.86, 3313.88, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 433
3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.32, 434
3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 435
3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 436
3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 437
3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 438
3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and 439
Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 440
4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were 441
a school district. 442
Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school 443
established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall 444
comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 445
3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 446
3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6025, 447
3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.6411, 448
3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.717, 3313.7112, 449
3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.88, 3313.89, 3319.073, 450
3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 451
3319.393, 3319.46, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, 452
and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the 453

S. B. No. 105 Page 17
As Introduced
school were a school district and the school's board of trustees 454
were a district board of education. 455
Section 2. That existing sections 3314.03, 3326.11, and 456
3328.24 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 457
Section 3. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 458
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 459
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 460
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 461
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 462
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 463
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 464
Section 4. 465
466
1 2 3 4 5
A EDU DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND WORKFORCE
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 200578 Violence Prevention and $25,000,000 $0
School Safety
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $25,000,000 $0
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $25,000,000 $0
VIOLENCE PREVENTION AND SCHOOL SAFETY 467
The foregoing appropriation item 200578, Violence 468
Prevention and School Safety, shall be used to reimburse school 469
districts, community schools, STEM schools, college-preparatory 470
boarding schools, and chartered nonpublic schools for the cost 471

S. B. No. 105 Page 18
As Introduced
of implementing the requirements of section 3313.88 of the 472
Revised Code, in a manner determined by the Department of 473
Education and Workforce. 474
Section 5. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 475
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 476
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 477
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 478
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 479
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 480
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 481
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 482
of the 136th General Assembly. 483
Section 6. This act shall be known as Alyssa's Law. 484
Section 7. The General Assembly, applying the principle 485
stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that 486
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of 487
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, 488
presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended 489
by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the 490
sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections 491
as presented in this act: 492
Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 493
214, H.B. 250, and S.B. 168, all of the 135th General Assembly. 494
Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 47, 495
H.B. 214, and S.B. 168, all of the 135th General Assembly. 496
Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by both 497
H.B. 47 and H.B. 214 of the 135th General Assembly. 498